Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 3. Secondary Schools

§ 971.
Repealed.
1969, No. 298 (Adj. Sess.), § 79.

§ 972.
Repealed.
1975, No. 48, § 14, eff. April 15, 1975.

§ 973.
Repealed.
1969, No. 298 (Adj. Sess.), § 79.

§§ 974,
975.
Repealed.
1975, No. 48, § 14, eff. April 15, 1975.

§ 976.
Repealed.
1969, No. 298 (Adj. Sess.), § 79.